Utah statutes.
57-3-101.   Certificate of acknowledgment, proof of execution, jurat, or other certificate required -- Notarial acts affecting real property -- Right to record documents unaffected by subdivision ordinances.

(1)  A certificate of the acknowledgment of any document, or of the proof of the execution of any document, or a jurat as defined in Section 46-1-2, or other notarial certificate containing the words "subscribed and sworn" or their substantial equivalent, that is signed and certified by the officer taking the acknowledgment, proof, or jurat, as provided in this title, entitles the document and the certificate to be recorded in the office of the recorder of the county where the real property is located.

(2)  Notarial acts affecting real property in this state shall also be performed in conformance with Title 46, Chapter 1, Notaries Public Reform Act.

(3)  Nothing in the provisions of Title 10, Chapter 9a, Part 6, Subdivisions, and Title 17, Chapter 27a, Part 6, Subdivisions, shall prohibit the recording of a document which is otherwise entitled to be recorded under the provisions of this chapter.



Amended by Chapter 254, 2005 General Session

